Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1421
Franchise; termination; effect.

If franchisor is permitted to terminate or not continue a franchise,
and is further permitted not to enter into a franchise, for the line-make
in the community, no franchise shall thereafter be entered into for the sale
of a motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer, motorcycle, or
trailer dealer of that line-make in the community, unless the franchisor has
first established in
a hearing held under the Motor
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act that there has been a change of
circumstances so that the community at that time can be reasonably expected
to support the dealership.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 21;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 73.